District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.04

Duplicative names prohibited.

No public space in the District of Columbia shall be given the same name as that given another public space in the District.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 404, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-454.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 13-288 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982 (‘the Act’), and notwithstanding section 404 of the Act, which requires no public space in the District of Columbia be given the same name as that given another public space in the District, the Council of the District of Columbia redesignated the Langley-McKinley Recreation Center as the ‘Harry L. Thomas, Sr., Recreation Center’.”